Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-616
Orphanages and other homes; establishment under other laws.

Sections 21-612 to 21-615 shall not be considered to prohibit the formation of corporations under other corporation laws of this state.

Laws 1907, c. 30, § 5, p. 159;

R.S.1913, § 616;

C.S.1922, § 510;

C.S.1929, § 24-613;

R.S.1943, § 21-616.